Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-204
Informational signs; erection; conform with rules and regulations; minimum service requirements.

(1) Signs, displays, and devices giving specific information of interest to the traveling public shall be erected by or at the direction of the Department of Transportation and maintained within the right-of-way at appropriate distances from interchanges on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways and from roads of the state primary system as shall conform with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department to carry out this section and section 39-205. Such rules and regulations shall be consistent with national standards promulgated from time to time by the appropriate authority of the federal government pursuant to 23 U.S.C. 131(f).

(2) For purposes of this section, specific information of interest to the traveling public shall mean only information about camping, lodging, food, attractions, and motor fuel and associated services, including trade names.

(3) The minimum service that is required to be available for each type of service shall include:

(a) Motor fuel services including:

(i) Vehicle services, which shall include fuel, oil, and water;

(ii) Restroom facilities and drinking water;

(iii) Continuous operation of such services for at least sixteen hours per day, seven days per week, for freeways and expressways and continuous operation of such services for at least twelve hours per day, seven days per week, for conventional roads; and

(iv) Telephone services;

(b) Attraction services including:

(i) An attraction of regional significance with the primary purpose of providing amusement, historical, cultural, or leisure activity to the public;

(ii) Restroom facilities and drinking water; and

(iii) Adequate parking accommodations;

(c) Food services including:

(i) Licensing or approval of such services, when required;

(ii) Continuous operation of such services to serve at least two meals per day, six days per week;

(iii) Modern sanitary facilities; and

(iv) Telephone services;

(d) Lodging services including:

(i) Licensing or approval of such services, when required;

(ii) Adequate sleeping accommodations; and

(iii) Telephone services; and

(e) Camping services including:

(i) Licensing or approval of such services, when required;

(ii) Adequate parking accommodations; and

(iii) Modern sanitary facilities and drinking water.

Laws 1975, LB 213, § 9;

Laws 1987, LB 741, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-634.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 22;

Laws 2010, LB926, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 87.